Nebraska, session 109, LB53.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB53 LB53
2025 2025
Section 1. The intent of the Legislature is to support pregnant
people and not criminalize pregnancy or punish people for their pregnancy
outcomes or for their decisions relating to their pregnancy.
Sec. 2. A person shall not be cited, arrested, or prosecuted for
any offense relating to the outcome of such person's own pregnancy,
including experiencing a stillbirth or miscarriage, the intentional
termination of a pregnancy, or any other pregnancy outcome that does not
result in a live birth.
Sec. 3. A person shall be immune from any civil action if such
action is based upon the pregnancy outcome of such person's own
pregnancy, including experiencing a stillbirth or miscarriage, the
intentional termination of a pregnancy, or any other pregnancy outcome
that does not result in a live birth.
-2-